Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales made to a school or a school district.(2) For purposes of this section "school" means a public or private school, educational institution, or educational program that provides instruction to kindergarten through grade 12 students, regardless of whether a grade level is assigned or whether the program is designated elementary or secondary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) This chapter does not apply to the use of personal property by a school or school district.(2) For purposes of this section "school" means a public or private school, educational institution, or educational program that provides instruction to kindergarten through grade 12 students, regardless of whether a grade level is assigned or whether the program is designated elementary or secondary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.--- END ---